Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-124
Bridges or buildings; damages; actions to recover.

In all cases where any bridge or any public building, the property of any county within this state, shall be injured or destroyed by any person or persons, either negligently, carelessly or willfully and maliciously, it shall be the duty of the county board, for and in the name of the county, to sue for and recover such damages as shall have occurred by reason thereof, and the money so recovered shall be paid into the treasury of the county, and by the treasurer be credited to the fund out of which such bridge or building was constructed or repaired. The county board shall also examine and approve and perform all duties required to be performed with respect to annual inventory statements prepared by other county officers and filed with the board, with respect to county personal property as provided in sections 23-346 to 23-350.

Laws 1879, § 25, p. 363;

Laws 1887, c. 27, § 1, p. 354;

Laws 1909, c. 30, § 1, p. 212;

R.S.1913, § 954;

Laws 1915, c. 18, § 1, p. 77;

Laws 1919, c. 66, § 1, p. 177;

Laws 1919, c. 67, § 1, p. 180;

Laws 1921, c. 144, § 1, p. 617;

C.S.1922, § 854;

C.S.1929, § 26-108;

Laws 1935, c. 107, § 7, p. 347;

Laws 1939, c. 28, § 8, p. 150;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-108;

R.S.1943, § 23-124.